cs: Design regálu na víno: Dekorativní; Moderní; Tradiční; Užitkový; Jiné
sv: Design vinställ: Dekorativ; Modern; Traditionell; Verktyg; Övrigt
ro-RO: Design suport pentru vinuri: Decorativ; Modern; Tradițional; Utilitar; Altele
pt-BR: Design de prateleira para vinhos: Decorativo; Moderno; Tradicional; Utilitário; Outro
de: Weinregal-Design: Dekorativ; Modern; Traditionell; Utility; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Design da garrafeira: Decorativo; Moderno; Tradicional; Utilitário; Outro
ko: 와인 랙 디자인: 장식적인; 현대; 전통; 유틸리티; 기타
el: Σχέδιο σχάρας κρασιού: Διακοσμητικό; Σύγχρονο; Παραδοσιακή; Utility; Άλλο
ja: ワインラックのデザイン: 装飾; モダン; 従来の; ユーティリティ; その他
nb: Utforming på vinstativ: Dekorativ; Moderne; Tradisjonell; Nytte; Annet
fr: Design du casier à vin: Décoratif; Moderne; Traditionnel; Utilitaire; Autre
nl: Wijnrekontwerp: Decoratief; Modern; Traditioneel; Hulpmiddel; Andere
hu: Borállvány kialakítása: Díszítő; Modern; Hagyományos; Segéd; Egyéb
hr-HR: Dizajn stalka za vino: Ukrasni; Moderni; Tradicionalni; Uslužni; Ostalo
en: Wine rack design: Decorative; Modern; Traditional; Utility; Other
sk-SK: Dizajn stojanu na víno: Dekoratívny; Moderný; Tradičný; Úžitkový; Iné
vi: Thiết kế kệ rượu: Trang trí; Hiện đại; Truyền thống; Tiện ích; Khác
bg-BG: Дизайн на стелаж за вино: Декоративен; Модерен; Традиционен; Помощен; Други
zh-TW: 酒架設計: 裝飾; 現代; 傳統的; 多功能; 其他
da: Vinreoldesign: Dekorativ; Moderne; Traditionel; Utility; Andet
it: Design del portabottiglie: Decorativo; Età moderna; Tradizionale; Utility; Altro
lt-LT: Vyno lentynos dizainas: Dekoratyvinė; Moderni; Tradicinė; „Utility“ (atstumo); Kita
es: Diseño del botellero: Decorativo; Moderno; Traditional; Utilidad; Otros
pl: Projekt stojaka na wino: Dekoracyjny; Nowoczesna; Tradycyjny; Użyteczność; Inne
fi: Viinitelineen muotoilu: Koristeellinen; Moderni; Perinteinen; Hyötykäyttö; Muu
th: การออกแบบชั้นเก็บไวน์: ตกแต่ง; โมเดิร์น; แบบดั้งเดิม; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 酒架设计: 装饰性; 现代; 传统; 多功能型; 其他
ru: Дизайн винного стеллажа: Декоративный; Современный; Традиционный; Утилитарный; Другой
sl-SI: Zasnova stojala za vino: Dekorativna; Moderno; Tradicionalno; Uporabna; Drugo
tr: Şarap rafı tasarımı: Dekoratif; Modern; Geleneksel; İşlevsel; Diğer